Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-247
Shares without certificates.

(MBCA 6.26) (a) Unless the
articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors
of a corporation may authorize the issue of some or all of the shares of any
or all of its classes or series without certificates. The authorization does
not affect shares already represented by certificates until they are surrendered
to the corporation.

(b) Within a reasonable
time after the issue or transfer of shares without certificates, the corporation
shall send the shareholder a written statement of the information required
on certificates by subsections (b) and (c) of section 21-246, and, if applicable,
section 21-248.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 47.